src/install/bin/server/open.office31/share/uno_packages/cache/uno_packages/15FF.tmp_/dict-fr.oxt/fr_FR.dic
accueillir/iR()
bouillir/iQ()
cueillir/iR()
débouillir/iQ()
enfuir/iO()
fuir/iN()
mourir/iP()
recueillir/iR()
